Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 14 Waste and Estrepement

34-14-1.
Liability of tenant for life or years to reversioner or remainderman.

Every person seised of any real estate for the term of his or her own life, or for the life or lives of any other person or persons, or as a tenant for years, who commits or suffers any waste on such estate, shall forfeit his or her estate in the place so wasted and double the amount of the waste so done or suffered, to be recovered in an action of waste by the person entitled to the next estate in remainder or reversion in the place so wasted.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 268, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 333, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 384, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 587, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-14-1

.

34-14-2.
Liability of co-tenant.

Every joint tenant, tenant in common, or co-parcener who commits any waste on any estate he or she holds in joint tenancy, tenancy in common, or co-parcenary, without the consent of the other joint tenants, tenants in common, or co-parceners, shall forfeit double the amount of the waste so done, to be recovered by the other joint tenants, tenants in common, or co-parceners, to their own use.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 268, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 333, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 384, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 587, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

34-14-2

.

34-14-3.
Action in name of co-tenants.

In a case of waste as described in §

34-14-2

, any one or more of the other joint tenants, tenants in common, or co-parceners, may commence an action for waste in the name of all the joint tenants, tenants in common, or co-parceners.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 268, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 333, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 384, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 587, § 3; G.L. 1958, §

34-14-3

.

34-14-4.
Failure of person joined as plaintiff to appear.

If any person named as plaintiff without his or her consent neglects to appear, after being duly notified in such manner as the court shall direct, his or her name shall be stricken from the writ and pleadings, and the other persons named as plaintiffs may prosecute the action to final judgment and execution in their own names and for their own use.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 268, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 333, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 384, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 587, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

34-14-4

.

34-14-5.
Issuance of writ of estrepement.

The superior court for any county, on the application of the plaintiff, in an action for ejectment, partition, or waste, may issue a writ of estrepement, under the provisions following, directed to the division of sheriffs, requiring the deputy sheriff to stay all the waste on the estate that shall be described in the writ of estrepement.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 268, § 5; C.P.A. 1905, § 1222; G.L. 1909, ch. 333, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 384, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 587, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

34-14-5

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 64.

34-14-6.
Power of sheriff to stay waste.

The members of the division of sheriffs, charged with the service of a writ of estrepement, shall have power to stay all waste, as shall be directed in the writ, and to take such aid as shall be necessary for that purpose.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 268, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 333, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 384, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 587, § 6; P.L. 1939, ch. 659, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

34-14-6

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 64.

34-14-7.
Notice and hearing on estrepement.

Upon the application of any person for a writ of estrepement, the court, before issuing the writ, shall cause the person whose interests may be affected thereby, to be notified of the pendency of the application, in such manner as the court shall deem proper, to the end that the person so to be affected by, as well as the person applying for the writ, may be heard in the premises. Upon the hearing, the court may, in its discretion, issue or refuse to issue the writ, in the same manner as courts grant or refuse to grant injunctions in like cases.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 268, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 333, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 384, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 587, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

34-14-7

.

34-14-8.
Estrepement bond.

The court may, on the hearing, and before the issuing of the writ, require of the party applying for the writ a bond, with sufficient surety, in such sum as the court shall prescribe, to make good to the party whose interest may be affected by the writ all loss and damage which he or she may suffer by reason of the issuing of the writ, if the court, in its discretion, judges that the circumstances of the case or the rights of the parties require a bond to be given.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 268, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 333, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 384, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 587, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

34-14-8

.

34-14-9.
Return date of writ.

A writ of estrepement shall be made returnable at such time as the court shall direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 268, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 333, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 384, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 587, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

34-14-9

.